Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.708

Certified veteran-owned businesses—Identification in vendor registry.

The department shall identify in the department's vendor registry all vendors that are veteran-owned businesses as certified by the department of veterans affairs under RCW 43.60A.195.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 242; 2010 c 5 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Purpose—Construction—2010 c 5: See notes following RCW 43.60A.010.